ces-rus_present/apertium/apertium-ces/apertium-ces.ces.dix
    <pardef n="vyráb/ět__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ět</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ím</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íš</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íme</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íte</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ějí</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ěl</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__četl"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ěn</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__chtěn"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ění</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__úterý"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ějíc</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__další"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ěn</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nov/ý"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ěje</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ěje</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ějíc</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ějíc</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ějíce</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ějíce</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ějíce</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ěj</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__udrž"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ěn</l><r>ět<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/></r></p><par n="BASE__četl"/></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="mil/ovat__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ovat</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uji</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uju</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uješ</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uje</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ujeme</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ujem</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ujete</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ují</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ujou</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oval</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__četl"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ován</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__chtěn"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ování</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__úterý"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ujíc</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__další"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ován</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nov/ý"/></e>
      <e><p><l>uje</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uje</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ujíc</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ujíc</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ujíce</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ujíce</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ujíce</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uj</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__udrž"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ován</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/></r></p><par n="BASE__četl"/></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="napump/ovat__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ovat</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uji</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uju</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uješ</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uje</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ujeme</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ujem</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ujete</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ují</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ujou</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oval</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__četl"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ován</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__chtěn"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ování</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__úterý"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ován</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nov/ý"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ovav</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__měv"/></e>
      <e><p><l>uj</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__udrž"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ován</l><r>ovat<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/></r></p><par n="BASE__četl"/></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="aplikovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>aplik</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cestovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>cest</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="deprimovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>deprim</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="elektrizovat"><par n="v_neg"/><p><l>elektris</l><r>elektriz</r></p><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="generovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>gener</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="instalovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>instal</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kastrovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>kastr</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="konzumovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>konzum</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="losovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>los</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nahrazovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>nahraz</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="napumpovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>napump</i><par n="napump/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odhadovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>odhad</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ohlupovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ohlup</i><par n="napump/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="osvojovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>osvoj</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="podceňovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>podceň</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="produkovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>produk</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="přesměrovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>přesměr</i><par n="napump/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="přetěžovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>přetěž</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rezignovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>rezign</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spekulovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>spekul</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="umožňovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>umožň</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zahajovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zahaj</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aklimatizovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>aklimatiz</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bagatelizovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>bagateliz</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="degenerovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>degener</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disponovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>dispon</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dovozovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>dovoz</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="faxovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>fax</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hlídkovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>hlídk</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="integrovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>integr</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="komunikovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>komunik</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="korespondovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>korespond</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="likvidovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>likvid</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mapovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>map</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="motivovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>motiv</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="neutralizovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>neutralis</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ochraňovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ochraň</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odůvodňovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>odůvodň</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="orientovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>orient</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="paralyzovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>paralys</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="podstupovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>podstup</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="poskakovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>poskak</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="privatizovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>privatiz</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prozrazovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>prozraz</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="přesazovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>přesaz</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="přiživovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>přiživ</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="relaxovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>relax</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rozrušovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>rozruš</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="situovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>situ</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sportovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>sport</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="svěřovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>svěř</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uchylovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>uchyl</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ustanovovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ustanov</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="opakovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>vopak</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vylepovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>vylep</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vytěsňovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>vytěsň</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zabezpečovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zabezpeč</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zasluhovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zasluh</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zesměšňovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zesměšň</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="znásilňovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>znásilň</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ztělesňovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ztělesň</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="účtovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>účt</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
